Tennessee, session 114, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4204(a), is amended by
deleting "subsection (a)" in subdivision (a)(2) and substituting "subdivision (a)(1)", designating
the subsection as subdivision (a)(1), and adding the following as a new subdivision:
(2) If a school conducts a security screening through a weapons detection
system and the weapons detection system triggers an alert on a container, package, or
other enclosure in the possession of a student or visitor, then a school employee who
has completed the training described in § 49-6-4212 and who is designated by the
principal to conduct a search for purposes of this subdivision (a)(2) may search the
container, package, or other enclosure that triggered the weapons detection system
alert. This subdivision (a)(2) does not authorize a search of an enclosure that is part of a
student's or visitor's clothing for which the student or visitor is wearing.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4212(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) A school administrator or school employee designated by a school principal
for purposes of § 49-6-4204(a)(2) must complete the orientation and training developed
by the department pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) prior to conducting a search pursuant to
§ 49-6-4204(a)(1)(B)(iii), § 49-6-4204(a)(2), or § 49-6-4205(a)(2)(C).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1524
010744
- 1 -